Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Article 2. Attorneys.

Sec. 22.20.040.
Appearance.

An action or proceeding may be prosecuted or defended by a party in person or by attorney. However,

the United States shall appear by an attorney in all cases; and

a corporation, either public or private, shall appear by an attorney in all cases unless an exception to the corporation’s appearance by an attorney has been explicitly made by law.

When a party appears by attorney, the written proceedings shall be in the name of the attorney, who is the sole representative of the client as between the client and the adverse party.

History.

(§ 54-6-1 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 1992)

Sec. 22.20.050.
Authority to bind client, receive money or property, and give discharge.

An attorney may

bind the attorney’s client in any of the proceedings in an action or proceeding by agreement filed with the clerk or entered upon the journal of the court, and not otherwise;

receive money or property claimed by the client in an action or proceeding during its pendency, or within three years after judgment, and, upon the payment or delivery of it, discharge the claim or acknowledge satisfaction of the judgment.

However, this section does not prevent a party from employing a new attorney to issue execution upon a judgment, or to take the other proceedings prescribed by law for its enforcement, and when the party does so the authority of the former attorney ceases.

History.

(§ 54-6-2 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, the word “to” was deleted preceding “discharge” in (a)(2) of this section to correct a manifest error in the 1962 codification.

Sec. 22.20.060.
Appearance of attorney without authority.

If it is alleged by a party for whom an attorney appears that the attorney does so without authority, and the allegation is verified by the affidavit of the party, the court may, if it finds the allegation true, at any stage of the proceedings, relieve the party for whom the attorney has assumed to appear from the consequences of the attorney’s act.

History.

(§ 54-6-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 22.20.070.
Requiring proof of authority.

The court may, on motion of either party, and on showing reasonable grounds therefor, require the attorney for an adverse party to produce or prove the authority under which the attorney appears, and until the attorney does so may stay all proceedings by the attorney on behalf of the party for whom the attorney assumes to appear.

History.

(§ 54-6-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 22.20.080.
Compelling attorney to deliver over money or papers.

When an attorney refuses to deliver over money or papers to a person from or for whom the attorney has received them in the course of professional employment, whether in a judicial proceeding or not, a court may, by order, require the attorney to do so within a specified time or show cause why punishment for a contempt should not be imposed on the attorney.

History.

(§ 54-6-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 22.20.090.
Court order to deliver over money or papers.

If an attorney claims a lien upon the money or papers under AS

34.35.430

, the court, in making an order under AS

22.20.080

, shall

impose, as a condition of making the order, that the client give security, in form and amount to be directed, to satisfy the lien when determined in an action;

summarily inquire into the facts on which the claim of a lien is founded, and determine it; or

direct the trial of the controversy by a jury, or refer it, and upon the verdict or report determine it as in other cases.

History.

(§ 54-6-8 ACLA 1949)